Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska30-24,121
Certificate discharging liens securing fiduciary performance.

After his appointment has terminated, the personal representative, his sureties, or any successor of either, upon the filing of a verified application showing, so far as is known by the applicant, that no action concerning the estate is pending in any court, is entitled to receive a certificate from the registrar that the personal representative appears to have fully administered the estate in question. The certificate evidences discharge of any lien on any property given to secure the obligation of the personal representative in lieu of bond or any surety, but does not preclude action against the personal representative or the surety.

Laws 1974, LB 354, § 199, UPC § 3-1007.